South Dakota, session 2026, SB115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 41-9-1.1 be AMENDED:
41-9-1.1. Except for controlled access facilities as defined in § 31-8-1, interstate
highways, unimproved section lines not commonly used as public rights-of-way, and
highways within parks or recreation areas or within or adjoining public shooting areas or
game refuges posted for restriction of an applicable use as hereinafter set forth by the
Department of Game, Fish and Parks, § 41-9-1 does not apply to fishing, trapping, or
hunting on highways or other public rights-of-way within this state that meet the
requirements of § 41-9-1.3. For purposes of this section, hunting on highways or other
public rights-of-way includes:
(1) The shooting at or taking by legal methods of small game, except mourning dove,
that are located within the boundaries of the highway or public right-of-way, with
the exception of mourning doves when perched on or within range of electrical
power lines; and
(2) The shooting at or taking by legal methods of small game, except mourning dove,
that are in flight over private land, if the small game has either originated from or
has taken flight from the highway or public right-of-way or if the small game is in
the process of flying over the highway or public right-of-way.
Only the owner of the occupied dwelling, church, or schoolhouse; the owner of
livestock; or a person who has written permission from the owner of the occupied dwelling,
church, or schoolhouse, or the owner of the livestock may use such highways or rights-
of-way for the purposes of discharging any firearm or for the purposes of hunting defined
in this title within a six hundred sixty-foot safety zone surrounding an occupied dwelling,
a church, schoolhouse, or livestock. No other person may discharge a firearm at small
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

115D 2 115
game within the safety zone. No person, except the adjoining landowner or any person
receiving written permission from the adjoining landowner, may use such highways or
rights-of-way for the purpose of trapping within six hundred sixty feet of an occupied
dwelling, church, or schoolhouse. A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor. If
any person is convicted of knowingly discharging a firearm within six hundred sixty feet
of any occupied dwelling, church, or schoolhouse for which that distance has been clearly
and accurately marked and posted, the court shall, in addition to any other penalty, revoke
the person's hunting privileges for a period of one year from the date of conviction. The
sentencing court may order the revocation of hunting privileges authorized by this section
to be served consecutively with any other revocation of the person's hunting privileges
imposed for a violation for which the person is convicted and for which revocation of the
privileges is authorized under this title.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.